apertium-ina.ina.dix
     <pardef n="urls">
        <e><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><!--      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re> --><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="horas">
        <e><re>[0-2]?[0-9]h[0-6][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="hour"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="numeros">
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
        <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?([ ]?%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="pardret">
        <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="paresq">
        <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
        <e><re>¿</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="separa">
        <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

  </pardefs>
